vi: Bề mặt lắp đặt tương thích: Mép bìa còng; Bìa/mép sách; Phần cứng/chân đế trống; Mép bìa hồ sơ/flipbook; Mép bục giảng/bục phát biểu; Chân đế micro; Mặt/mép giá để bản nhạc; Trụ/cột giá để bản nhạc; Mặt bàn/mép bàn; Phổ thông/đa bề mặt; Khác
hr-HR: Kompatibilna površina za montažu: Rub registratora/mape; Korice/rub knjige; Hardver/stalak za bubanj; Rub mape / bloka za crtanje; Rub govornice/podija; Stalak za mikrofon; Stalak za note / rub stalka; Šipka/cijev stalka za note; Rub radne površine / stola; Univerzalno / za više površina; Ostalo
it: Superficie di montaggio compatibile: Bordo del raccoglitore; Copertina/bordo del libro; Hardware per batteria/supporto; Bordo della cartella/flipbook; Bordo del leggio/podio; Asta microfonica; Piano/bordo del leggio musicale; Tubo/asta del leggio musicale; Piano del tavolo/bordo della scrivania; Universale/multisuperficie; Altro
zh-TW: 相容安裝表面: 活頁夾邊緣; 書封/書邊; 鼓組硬體/支架; 資料夾/翻頁書邊緣; 講台/演講台邊緣; 麥克風架; 譜架桌面/擋板; 譜架管身/立柱; 桌面/書桌邊緣; 通用/多種表面; 其他
zh-CN: 适用安装表面: 活页夹边缘; 书籍封面/边缘; 架子鼓硬件/支架; 文件夹/翻页书边缘; 讲台/演讲台边缘; 麦克风支架; 乐谱架面板/托沿; 乐谱架管/立杆; 桌面/书桌边缘; 通用/多表面; 其他
fr: Surface de montage compatible: Bord de classeur; Couverture/bord de livre; Accastillage/pied de batterie; Bord de dossier/chevalet; Bord de pupitre/podium; Pied de micro; Plateau/rebord de pupitre à partition; Tube/mât de pupitre à partition; Bord de table/bureau; Universel/multisurface; Autre
pt-PT: Superfície de montagem compatível: Borda de encadernação; Capa/borda do livro; Ferragens/suporte de bateria; Borda de pasta/flipbook; Borda de atril/púlpito; Suporte de microfone; Mesa/aba de estante de partituras; Tubo/haste de estante de partituras; Borda de tampo de mesa/secretária; Universal/multissuperfície; Outro
ko: 호환 가능한 장착 표면: 바인더 모서리; 책 표지/모서리; 드럼 하드웨어/스탠드; 폴더/플립북 모서리; 연단/포디움 모서리; 마이크 스탠드; 보면대 데스크/립; 보면대 튜브/폴; 탁상/책상 모서리; 범용/다중 표면; 기타
cs: Kompatibilní montážní povrch: Okraj pořadače; Obálka/okraj knihy; Hardware/stojan pro bicí; Okraj složky / flipbooku; Okraj řečnického pultu / pódia; Stojan na mikrofon; Deska / pult stojanu na noty; Trubka/tyč stojanu na noty; Okraj stolu/desky; Univerzální / více povrchů; Jiné
nb: Kompatibel monteringsoverflate: Permkant; Bokomslag/-kant; Trommemaskinvare/-stativ; Mappe-/flippbakkant; Talerstol-/podiumkant; Mikrofonstativ; Notestativplate/-kant; Notestativrør/-stang; Bordplate-/skrivebordskant; Universell/fleroverflate; Annet
de: Kompatible Montagefläche: Ordnerkante; Buchdeckel/-kante; Schlagzeug-Hardware/-Ständer; Mappen-/Daumenkinokante; Pult-/Podiumskante; Mikrofonständer; Notenständerablage/-kante; Notenständerrohr/-stange; Tischplatte/Schreibtischkante; Universal/Multioberfläche; Sonstige
ru: Совместимая монтажная поверхность: Край папки; Обложка / край книги; Фурнитура / стойка барабана; Край папки / флипбука; Край кафедры / подиума; Микрофонная стойка; Пюпитр / полка пюпитра; Трубка / стойка пюпитра; Край стола; Универсальный / для нескольких поверхностей; Другое
pl: Kompatybilna powierzchnia montażowa: Krawędź segregatora; Okładka / krawędź książki; Osprzęt perkusyjny / statyw; Krawędź teczki / flipbooka; Krawędź pulpitu / mównicy; Statyw mikrofonowy; Pulpit nutowy / półka; Rurka / sztyca statywu nutowego; Krawędź blatu / biurka; Uniwersalne / wielopowierzchniowe; Inne
bg-BG: Съвместима монтажна повърхност: Ръб на папка; Корица/ръб на книга; Хардуер/стойка за барабани; Ръб на папка/флипбук; Ръб на аналой/подиум; Стойка за микрофон; Плот/ръб на стойка за ноти; Тръба/стълб на стойка за ноти; Ръб на маса/бюро; Универсална/за различни повърхности; Друго
tr: Uyumlu montaj yüzeyi: Klasör kenarı; Kitap kapağı/kenarı; Davul donanımı/sehpası; Dosya/sunum defteri kenarı; Kürsü/podyum kenarı; Mikrofon sehpası; Nota sehpası tablası/kenarı; Nota sehpası borusu/direği; Masaüstü/masa kenarı; Evrensel/çoklu yüzey; Diğer
sl-SI: Združljiva površina za pritrditev: Rob mape; Platnica/rob knjige; Strojna oprema/stojalo za bobne; Rob mape/knjižice; Rob govorniškega pulta; Stojalo za mikrofon; Plošča/rob notnega stojala; Cev/palica notnega stojala; Miza/rob mize; Univerzalno/za več površin; Drugo
ro-RO: Suprafață de montare compatibilă: Margine biblioraft/dosar; Copertă/margine carte; Hardware/stativ tobe; Margine mapă/flipbook; Margine pupitru/podium; Stativ de microfon; Pupitru/bordură stativ partituri; Tub/tijă stativ partituri; Blat/margine de birou; Universal / multi-suprafață; Altele
pt-BR: Superfície de montagem compatível: Borda de fichário; Capa/borda de livro; Ferragens/suporte de bateria; Borda de pasta/flipbook; Borda de púlpito/tribuna; Pedestal de microfone; Bandeja/borda de estante de partitura; Tubo/haste de estante de partitura; Superfície/borda de mesa; Universal/multissuperfície; Outra
el: Συμβατή επιφάνεια τοποθέτησης: Άκρη ντοσιέ; Εξώφυλλο/άκρη βιβλίου; Υλικός εξοπλισμός/βάση ντραμς; Άκρη φακέλου/flipbook; Άκρη αναλογίου/βάθρου; Βάση μικροφώνου; Επιφάνεια/χείλος αναλογίου; Σωλήνας/ορθοστάτης αναλογίου; Επιφάνεια/άκρη τραπεζιού; Γενικής χρήσης/πολλαπλών επιφανειών; Άλλο
lt-LT: Suderinamas montavimo paviršius: Segtuvo kraštas; Knygos viršelis / kraštas; Būgnų įranga / stovas; Aplanko / segtuvo kraštas; Pulto / pakylos kraštas; Mikrofono stovas; Natų pulto stalčiukas / kraštas; Natų pulto vamzdis / stovas; Stalviršis / stalo kraštas; Universalu / keli paviršiai; Kita
nl: Compatibel montageoppervlak: Ringbandrand; Boekomslag/-rand; Drumhardware/-standaard; Map-/flipbookrand; Katheder-/podiumrand; Microfoonstandaard; Muzieklessenaarblad/-rand; Muzieklessenaarbuis/-stang; Tafelblad-/bureaurand; Universeel/meerdere oppervlakken; Overig
es: Superficie de montaje compatible: Borde de carpeta; Cubierta/borde de libro; Herrajes/soporte de batería; Borde de carpeta/libro animado; Borde de atril/podio; Soporte de micrófono; Base/borde del atril; Tubo/poste del atril; Mesa/borde de escritorio; Universal/multisuperficie; Otro
sk-SK: Kompatibilná montážna plocha: Okraj zakladača; Obal/okraj knihy; Bicí hardvér/stojan; Okraj priečinka/flipbooka; Okraj pultu/pódia; Stojan na mikrofón; Doska/okraj notového pultu; Tyč/stĺpik notového pultu; Okraj stola/pracovnej dosky; Univerzálne/rôzne povrchy; Iné
sv: Kompatibel monteringsyta: Pärmkant; Bokpärm/bokkant; Trumhårdvara/stativ; Mapp-/blädderblockskant; Kateder-/podiekant; Mikrofonstativ; Notställ/notställskant; Notställsrör/-pinne; Bordsskiva/bordskant; Universell/flera ytor; Övrigt
th: พื้นผิวการติดตั้งที่เข้ากันได้: สันแฟ้ม; ปก/สันหนังสือ; ฮาร์ดแวร์/ขาตั้งกลอง; แฟ้ม/สันสมุดโน้ต; แท่นอ่าน/ขอบโพเดียม; ขาตั้งไมค์; ที่วาง/ขอบขาตั้งโน้ตเพลง; ท่อ/เสาขาตั้งโน้ตเพลง; ท็อปโต๊ะ/ขอบโต๊ะ; อเนกประสงค์/หลายพื้นผิว; อื่นๆ
ja: 互換性のある取り付け面: バインダーの縁; 本の表紙/縁; ドラムハードウェア/スタンド; フォルダー/フリップブックの縁; 演台/ポディウムの縁; マイクスタンド; 譜面台のデスク/リップ; 譜面台のチューブ/ポール; 卓上/デスクの縁; ユニバーサル/マルチサーフェス; その他
da: Kompatibel monteringsoverflade: Ringbindskant; Bogomslag/-kant; Trommehardware/-stativ; Mappe-/flipbogskant; Talepult-/podiekant; Mikrofonstativ; Nodestativets flade/kant; Nodestativets rør/stang; Bordplade/bordkant; Universel/flere overflader; Andet
en: Compatible mounting surface: Binder edge; Book cover/edge; Drum hardware/stand; Folder/flipbook edge; Lectern/podium edge; Mic stand; Music stand desk/lip; Music stand tube/pole; Tabletop/desk edge; Universal/multi-surface; Other
hu: Kompatibilis szerelési felület: Mappa széle; Könyvborító/könyvszél; Dob hardver/állvány; Mappa/flipbook széle; Katedra/pódium széle; Mikrofonállvány; Kottaállvány lapja/széle; Kottaállvány csöve/rúdja; Asztallap/íróasztal széle; Univerzális/több felületre; Egyéb
fi: Yhteensopiva kiinnityspinta: Kansion reuna; Kirjan kansi / reuna; Rumpujen metalliosat / teline; Kansion / lehtiön reuna; Puhujakorokkeen reuna; Mikrofoniteline; Nuottitelineen taso / reuna; Nuottitelineen putki / tanko; Pöytälevy / pöydän reuna; Yleinen / useille pinnoille; Muu